test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-suekkj_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - sueʹǩǩ: # Noun a-stem 'birch/koivu' - full paradigm
# cf. Sammallahti, Pekka 2012: 150
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: suẹʹǩǩ
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: suẹʹjj
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: suẹʹjj
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: suäkˈka
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: suẹʹjjest
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Com+Indef: sueʹjjin
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Ess+Indef: suẹʹǩǩen
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Par+Indef: suẹʹjjed
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [suẹʹjjtaa, suẹʹjjtää]
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: suẹʹjj
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: sueʹjji
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: sueʹjjid
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: sueʹjjid
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: sueʹjjin
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Com+Indef: sueʹjjivuiʹm
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [sueʹjjitaa, sueʹjjitää]
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: suäǥǥaž
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: suäǥǥa
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: suäǥǥa
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: suäǥǥže
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: suäǥǥast
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Com+Indef: suäǥǥain
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [suäǥǥataa, suäǥǥatää]
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Ess+Indef: suäǥǥžen
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Par+Indef: suäǥǥžed
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: suäǥǥa
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: suäǥǥai
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: suäǥǥaid
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: suäǥǥaid
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: suäǥǥain
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Com+Indef: suäǥǥaivuiʹm
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [suäǥǥaitaa, suäǥǥaitää]
